Louisiana, session 2026, HB976.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 9:2796.1 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§2796.1. Reckless throwing from parade float
A. No person shall knowingly or negligently throw an object from a parade
float in a manner that is foreseeable to cause injury to another person.
B. Whoever violates this Section and causes injury to another person shall
be presumed liable for such injury.
C. Nothing in this Section shall be construed to prohibit a specific item or
the handing, dropping, or responsible tossing of any item that is not otherwise
prohibited.